Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 3. Special Cemetery Districts

§ 35-8-301.
Procedure for proposing establishment of special cemetery district.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

A special cemetery district may be established under the procedures for petitioning, hearing and election of special districts as set forth in the Special District Elections Act of 1994.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 1; W.S. 1957, §n 35-388; Laws 1959, ch. 146, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, §§ 2, 5.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to bond elections, see § §

22-21-101

to

22-21-112

, and

22-21-201

.

§ 35-8-302.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 2, related to establishment of a district by majority vote.

§ 35-8-303.
Body corporate; name and style; powers generally; rules and regulations of trustees.

Each district established is hereby declared to be a body corporate by the name and style of the
. . . . .
cemetery district and the name therefor shall be entered upon the commissioners’ records and shall be selected by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the greater area of land within the district is located. In the name so selected, the district may hold property and be a party to contracts, shall have power to sue and be sued, shall be empowered through its governing board to acquire real and personal property and equipment for cemetery purposes by gift, devise, bequest or purchase and to enter into contracts for the acquisition by purchase or lease of real and personal property and equipment; to convey, lease and otherwise dispose of its property for cemetery purposes and as a cemetery district, to establish sinking funds for said purposes; to issue bonds for the purchase of real property and improvements and equipment for the same, for cemetery purposes in the manner hereinafter provided, and the trustees thereof shall have power to make such rules and regulations as are necessary for the proper operation of the district and shall file them with the county clerk for each county in which the district is located.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-390; Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 35-8-304.
Election of trustees in newly established districts; terms.

An election of six (6) trustees shall be held therein at the same time as the election for formation of the district. Trustees shall serve without compensation to govern the affairs of the district. There shall be elected three (3) members to serve until the next succeeding district election, and three (3) members to serve until the second succeeding district election and until their successors are elected and qualified.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-391; Laws 1963, ch. 9, § 1; 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1994, ch. 99, § 2; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 35-8-305.
Procedure for election of trustees in previously existing districts.

In all such districts existing as of January 1, 1999, the terms of directors shall be allowed to expire and a vacancy shall be declared and filled pursuant to W.S.

22-29-201

and

22-29-202

until the next regular scheduled subsequent director election as provided under W.S.

22-29-112

. At that election three (3) trustees shall be elected for four (4) year terms and three (3) for two (2) year terms.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 35-392; Laws 1963, ch. 9, § 2; 1969, ch. 48, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2.

§ 35-8-306.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 6, related to the requirement that the voter's name appear on a poll list.

§ 35-8-307.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 99, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 7, related to the oath required if an elector's name does not appear on the poll list.

§§ 35-8-308 through 35-8-313.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 243, §§ 8 through 13, related to certain procedures regarding election of trustees of special cemetery districts.

§ 35-8-314.
Administration of finances; assessment and levy of taxes.

The assessor shall at the time of making the annual assessment of his district also assess the property of each special cemetery district in his county and return to the county assessor at the time of returning the assessment schedules, separate schedules listing the property of each such district assessed by him. The separate schedules shall be compiled by the county assessor, footed and returned to the board of county commissioners as provided for other assessment schedules.

The board of county commissioners, at the time of making the levy for county purposes shall levy a tax for that year upon the taxable property in such district in its county for its proportionate share based on assessed valuation of the estimated amount of funds needed by each such district, but in no case shall the tax for such district exceed in any one (1) year the amount of three (3) mills on each dollar of assessed valuation of such property. The taxes and assessments of all special cemetery districts shall be collected by the county collector at the same time and in the same manner as state and county taxes are collected, provided, however, said assessment and tax levied under provisions of this act [§§

35-8-301

through

35-8-323

] shall not be construed as being a part of the general county mill levy.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 35-401; Laws 1959, ch. 146, § 3; 1993, ch. 75, § 1; 2015 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2017 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2015 amendment,

in the first sentence in (a), substituted “through

16-4-125

” for “through

16-4-124

.”

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, deleted the first sentence of (a), which read: “The board of trustees of special cemetery districts shall administer the finances of such districts according to the provisions of the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act,
W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-125

, and file a report as provided by
W.S.

9-1-507

.”

Validity of tax levy. —

The county commissioners can levy a tax of not exceeding three mills for the operation and maintenance of a cemetery district though tax when combined with town's general levy exceeded eight mills, since operation and maintenance of cemetery district is not an essential function of a town or city. War Memorial Hosp. of Dist. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 73 Wyo. 371, 279 P.2d 472,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1955).

§ 35-8-315.
Tax exemption.

The property of such cemetery districts shall be exempt from taxation.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 35-402.

§ 35-8-316.
Bond issue; question of issuance to be submitted to electors; amount and interest.

The board of trustees of any cemetery district may, whenever a majority thereof so decide, request the board of county commissioners to submit to the electors of the district the question whether the board of trustees shall be authorized to issue the coupon bonds of the district in a certain amount, not to exceed two percent (2%) of the assessed value of the taxable property in the district, and bearing a certain rate of interest, payable and redeemable at a certain time, not exceeding twenty-five (25) years for the purchase of real property, for the construction or purchase of improvements and for equipment for cemetery purposes.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 35-403; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 31; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions requiring voter approval and imposing limitation on debt, see art. 16, §§ 4, 8, Wyo. Const.

As to limitation of amount and redemption of bonds, see §§

16-5-301

to

16-5-303

.

§ 35-8-317.
Bond issue; conduct of election.

The election authorized under W.S.

35-8-316

shall be called, conducted and the results thereof canvassed and certified in all respects as near as practicable in the same manner as is provided for bond elections by the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 35-404; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

Cross references. —

See §

35-8-301

and cross references thereto.

§ 35-8-318.
Bond issue; issuance; form; advertising for bidders; sale.

If the proposal to issue said bonds shall be approved, the board of trustees may issue such bonds in such form as the board may direct and shall give notice by publication in some newspaper published in the counties in which said district is located and in some newspaper of general circulation in the capital of this state of its intention to issue and negotiate such bonds, and to invite bidders therefor; provided that in no case shall such bonds be sold for less than their full or par value and the accrued interest thereon at the time of their delivery. And the said trustees are authorized to reject any bids, and to sell said bonds at private sale, if they deem it for the best interests of the district.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 35-405.

§ 35-8-319.
Bond issue; preparation and execution; certification; to be registered by county treasurer.

After ascertaining the best terms upon and the lowest interest at which said bonds can be negotiated, the board shall secure the proper engraving and printing and consecutive numbering thereof, and said bonds shall thereupon be otherwise properly prepared and executed. They must bear the signature of the president of the board of trustees and be countersigned by the secretary of the board and bear the district seal and be countersigned by the county treasurer of the county in which the funds of the district are kept, and the coupons attached to the bonds must be signed by said president, secretary and county treasurer; and the secretary of the board shall endorse a certificate upon every such bond, that the same is within the lawful debt limit of such district and is issued according to law and he shall sign such certificate in his official character. When so executed, they shall be registered by the county treasurer where said district’s funds are kept in a book provided for that purpose, which must show the number and amount of each bond and the person to whom the same is issued.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 35-406.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision requiring endorsement on bonds, see art. 16, § 8, Wyo. Const.

§ 35-8-320.
Bond issue; payment guaranteed.

The full faith and credit of each cemetery district is solemnly pledged for the payment of the interest and the redemption of the principal of all bonds which are issued by such district.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 35-407.

§ 35-8-321.
Bond issue; payment of principal and interest.

The county treasurer where said district’s funds are kept may pay out of any moneys belonging to said district tax fund, the interest and the principal upon any bonds issued by such district, when the same becomes due, upon the presentation at his office of the proper coupon or bond, which must show the amount due, and each coupon must also show the number of the bond to which it belonged, and all bonds and coupons so paid, must be reported to the district trustees at their first regular meeting thereafter.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 35-408.

§ 35-8-322.
Bond issue; validity.

All cemetery districts heretofore formed and organized under the provisions of chapter 58 of the Session Laws of Wyoming, 1949 [repealed], or under the provisions of chapter 141, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1951 [repealed], are hereby declared to be duly organized and existing cemetery districts; and all bonds heretofore issued and sold for the purpose of providing for the purchase of real property and improvements and equipment for cemetery purposes, by any cemetery district established under the provisions of chapter 58, Session Laws of Wyoming, 1949, or under the provisions of chapter 141, of the Session Laws of Wyoming, 1951, where the purchase money for such bonds has been actually received and retained or used for the purpose for which such bonds were sold, are hereby declared to be the valid and legally binding obligations of such district and all proceedings under which such bonds were issued are approved, ratified and declared valid.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 35-409.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 58, Laws 1949, and ch. 141, Laws 1951, referred to in this section, were repealed by § 25, ch. 243, Laws 1955, and by § 24, ch. 244, Laws 1955.

§ 35-8-323.
Districts charged with maintaining existing public cemeteries.

All districts organized under the provisions of this act [§§

35-8-301

through

35-8-323

] are charged with the duty of maintaining existing public cemeteries owned and maintained by incorporated cities or towns, or otherwise, within the boundaries of the district; and such maintenance shall be as nearly uniform as possible.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 243, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 35-410.

Severability. —

Section 24, ch. 243, Laws 1955, reads: “It is hereby declared to be the legislative intention that if any portion or part of this act shall be judicially determined to be unconstitutional, the remainder of the act shall continue in full force and effect.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 25, ch. 243, Laws 1955, repealed ch. 58, Laws 1949, ch. 141, Laws 1951 and ch. 191, Laws 1953, creating special hospital and cemetery districts.

§ 35-8-324.
Cemeteries in cities and towns in conflict with special cemetery district.

No incorporated city or town which is or may be included within the boundaries of a special cemetery district organized under the laws of the state of Wyoming, shall purchase, establish, operate, maintain, improve or support a cemetery or cemetery grounds for a period of more than one (1) year after the formation of such cemetery district or for a period of more than two (2) months after the effective date of this act, whichever shall be later.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 170, § 1; 1955; ch. 212, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-411.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 170, Laws 1953, carried no provision as to its effective date, but was enacted at a session that adjourned on February 21, 1953.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Zoning regulations in relation to cemeteries, 96 ALR3d 921.